Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LITCHFIELD OPERA HOUSE.new text end new text begin $50,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the governing board of the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to the Greater Litchfield Opera House Association for expanding and installing balcony seating. new text end